Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1613
Findings and recommendations; exceptions; review by court.

In any and all cases referred to a child support referee by the district court, separate juvenile court, or county court, the parties shall have the right to take exceptions to the findings and recommendations made by the referee and to have a further hearing before such court for final disposition. The court upon receipt of the findings, recommendations, and exceptions shall review the child support referee's report and may accept or reject all or any part of the report and enter judgment based on the court's own determination.

Laws 1989, LB 265, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 53.

When a referee makes a report and no exception is filed, the district court reviews the referee's report de novo on the record; however, if an exception is filed, the party filing an exception is entitled to a hearing and the district court as a court of equity has the discretion to allow the presentation of new or additional evidence at an exception hearing. State on behalf of Lockwood v. Laue, 24 Neb. App. 909, 900 N.W.2d 582 (2017).